Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.085

Establishment of investigation unit—Receipt and use of criminal history information.

There is established a unit within the office of the attorney general for the purpose of detection, investigation, and prosecution of any act prohibited or declared to be unlawful under this chapter. The attorney general will employ supervisory, legal, and investigative personnel for the program, who must be qualified by training and experience. The attorney general is authorized to receive criminal history record information that includes nonconviction data for any purpose associated with the investigation of any person doing any act herein prohibited or declared to be unlawful under this chapter. Dissemination or use of nonconviction data for purposes other than that authorized in this section is prohibited.

[ 2008 c 74 s 7.]

NOTES:

Finding—2008 c 74: See note following RCW 51.04.024.